Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325F.171, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Unsafe cribs prohibited. (a) No commercial user may remanufacture, retrofit, sell, contract to sell or resell, lease, sublet, or otherwise place any unsafe crib in the stream of commerce deleted text begin on or after January 1, 2006deleted text end . (b) deleted text begin On or after January 1, 2006,deleted text end No person operating a hotel, motel, or lodging establishment shall provide any unsafe crib to any guest, either with or without charge, for use during the guest's stay. For the purposes of this paragraph, "hotel," "motel," and "lodging establishment" have the meanings given them in section 157.15. (c) A crib is presumed to be unsafe for purposes of this section if it does not conform to the standards endorsed or established by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission, including but not limited to Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, and ASTM International, as follows: (1) Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, part 1508, and any regulations adopted to amend or supplement the regulations; (2) Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, part 1509, and any regulations adopted to amend or supplement the regulations; (3) Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, part 1303, and any regulations adopted to amend or supplement the regulations;new text begin andnew text end (4) the following standards and specifications of ASTM International for corner posts of baby cribs and structural integrity of baby cribs: (i) ASTM F 966 (corner post standard); (ii) ASTM F 1169 (structural integrity of full-size baby cribs);new text begin andnew text end (iii) ASTM F 1822 (non-full-size cribs). (d) A crib is exempt from the provisions of this section if it is not intended for use by an infant; and at the time of selling, contracting to resell, leasing, subletting, or otherwise placing the crib in the stream of commerce, the commercial user attaches a written notice to the crib declaring that it is not intended to be used for an infant and is unsafe for use by an infant. A commercial user who complies with this paragraph is not liable for use of the crib contrary to the notice provided.